Washington statutes.
RCW 39.34.050

Duty to submit agreement to jurisdictional state officer or agency.

In the event that an agreement made pursuant to this chapter shall deal in whole or in part with the provision of services or facilities with regard to which an officer or agency of the state government has constitutional or statutory powers of control, the agreement shall, as a condition precedent to its entry into force, be submitted to the state officer or agency having such power of control. The agreement shall be approved or disapproved by the state officer or agency with regard to matters within his, her, or its jurisdiction within ninety days after receipt of the agreement. If a state officer or agency fails to act within the ninety-day time limit, the agreement shall be deemed approved by that state officer or agency.

[ 1992 c 161 s 6; 1967 c 239 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—1992 c 161: See note following RCW 70.44.450.